North Carolina, session 2025, HB340.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-150.6 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(1a) (i) Develop or purchase and (ii) disseminate a screening assessment to be used
in all middle schools to identify academically or intellectually gifted
students."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-150.7(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(1a) The use of the screening assessment provided pursuant to
G.S. 115C-150.6(1a) for all students in grade six to assist in identifying
academically or intellectually gifted students."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to cover the costs of the screening assessments provided pursuant to this
act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H340-v-1*